North Carolina, session 2025, HB1201.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Temporary Placement Pilot Program. – There is established the
Temporary Placement Pilot Program, administered by the Department of Health and Human
Services. The purpose of the Program is to provide high-acuity youth, who would require
placement in a psychiatric residential treatment facility (PRTF), be eligible for temporary
placement in a lower-level setting that assures safety for the youth through sufficient
wrap-around services and supports. The Program would focus on providing those high-acuity
youth with therapeutic alternatives to other temporary placements used during high-volume
periods, such as social service offices and emergency rooms. The Department of Health and
Human Services, Division of Social Services and Division of Mental Health, Developmental
Disabilities, and Substance Use Services, shall apply for any required waivers to provide these
flexibilities. The Program would begin within six months of receiving any required waivers and
adoption of temporary rules, if necessary.
SECTION 2. Study. – The Department of Health and Human Services shall study
and submit a report to the Joint Legislative Health and Human Services Oversight Committee by
October 1, 2026, on the outcomes of the Temporary Placement Pilot Program under Section 1 of
this act and all of the following:
(1) Allow experienced providers with a history of excellence to operate under a
temporary and less rigorous approval with post-opening compliance
verification until full licensure approval can be processed, including allowing
for video walkthroughs for the Division of Health Service Regulation
licensure approval.
(2) Reduce admission hesitancy by creating clinical exception pathways, by
providing liability protection with defined parameters, State-supported
clinical consultation, and enhanced reimbursement for high-acuity cases.
(3) Policy adjustments regarding emergency admission flexibility by (i) allowing
same-day comprehensive clinical assessments (CCA), (ii) permit the
admitting provider to complete the CCA, and (iii) accept provisional
documentation for immediate placement.
*H1201-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) Reintegration success rates of youth transiting from out-of-state provider
placements to the same or step-down levels of care, including family
reintegration, time to re-placement, family reunification outcomes, cost
comparison compared to in-State care, and reintegration success.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services the nonrecurring sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000)
for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to conduct the Temporary Placement Pilot Program, as enacted in
Section 1 of this act.
SECTION 4. Section 3 of this act becomes effective July 1, 2026. The remainder of
this act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 1201-First Edition